da: Bjælkemønster: Kombi; Kørsel; Flood; Pencil beam; SAE-kørsel; SAE-tåge; Scene/arbejde; Spot; Bred flood; Andet
fi: Sädekuvio: Yhdistelmä; Ajovalo; Hajavalo; Kapea keila; SAE-ajovalo; SAE-sumuvalo; Alue-/työvalo; Kohdevalo; Leveä hajavalo; Muu
sk-SK: Vzor lúča: Kombinovaný; Diaľkový; Rozptylový; Bodový úzky; Diaľkový SAE; Hmlový SAE; Pracovný/scénický; Bodový; Širokouhlý rozptylový; Iné
en: Beam pattern: Combo; Driving; Flood; Pencil beam; SAE driving; SAE fog; Scene/Work; Spot; Wide flood; Other
lt-LT: Šviesos pluošto raštas: Kombinuotas; Tolimųjų šviesų; Sklaidantis; Siauras („Pencil“); SAE tolimųjų šviesų; SAE rūko; Darbinis / aplinkos; Taškinis; Plačiai sklaidantis; Kita
pt-BR: Padrão de feixe: Combinado; Direção; Feixe amplo; Feixe tipo lápis; Direção SAE; Neblina SAE; Cena/trabalho; Feixe focado; Feixe superamplo; Outros
el: Μοτίβο δοκού: Συνδυασμός; Οδήγησης; Ευρείας δέσμης (Flood); Πολύ στενής δέσμης (Pencil beam); Οδήγησης SAE; Ομίχλης SAE; Σκηνής/Εργασίας; Σποτ; Πολύ ευρείας δέσμης (Wide flood); Άλλο
pt-PT: Padrão de feixe: Combinado; Condução; Largo; Feixe em lápis; Condução SAE; Nevoeiro SAE; Cena/trabalho; Foco; Largo amplo; Outro
fr: Forme du faisceau: Combiné; Conduite; Faisceau large; Faisceau étroit; Conduite SAE; Brouillard SAE; Scène/Travail; Spot; Faisceau très large; Autre
ko: 빔 패턴: 콤보; 드라이빙; 플러드; 펜슬 빔; SAE 드라이빙; SAE 안개등; 씬/작업; 스폿; 와이드 플러드; 기타
sl-SI: Vzorec žarka: Kombinirano; Za vožnjo; Široki snop; Ozek snop; SAE za vožnjo; SAE za meglo; Delovno/scensko; Točkovno; Zelo široki snop; Drugo
de: Strahlmuster: Kombi; Fahrlicht; Flutlicht; Punktstrahl; SAE-Fahrlicht; SAE-Nebellicht; Arbeitslicht; Spot; Breites Flutlicht; Sonstige
pl: Wzór wiązki światła: Combo; Drogowe; Rozproszone; Punktowe (Pencil beam); SAE drogowe; SAE przeciwmgielne; Robocze; Punktowe; Szerokie rozproszone; Inne
nb: Strålemønster: Kombi; Kjørelys; Flom; Pencil beam; SAE-kjørelys; SAE-tåkelys; Scene/arbeid; Spot; Bred flom; Annet
hr-HR: Uzorak snopa svjetla: Kombinirano; Za vožnju; Široki snop; Uski snop; SAE za vožnju; SAE za maglu; Za scenu/rad; Usmjereno; Vrlo široko; Ostalo
zh-CN: 光束模式: 混合光; 驾驶光; 泛光; 铅笔光束; SAE 驾驶光; SAE 雾灯光; 场景/工作光; 聚光; 宽泛光; 其他
th: รูปแบบของคาน: คอมโบ; ไฟพุ่ง; ไฟสว่างกว้าง; ลำแสงพุ่งไกล; ไฟพุ่งตามมาตรฐาน SAE; ไฟตัดหมอกตามมาตรฐาน SAE; ส่องกว้าง/สำหรับทำงาน; ไฟส่องเป็นจุด; ไฟสว่างกว้างพิเศษ; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 光束模式: 混合型; 駕駛燈型; 泛光型; 筆形光束; SAE 駕駛燈型; SAE 霧燈型; 場景/工作燈型; 聚光型; 寬泛光型; 其他
vi: Kiểu chùm sáng: Kết hợp; Lái xe; Chiếu tỏa; Chùm tia siêu hẹp; Lái xe chuẩn SAE; Chống sương mù chuẩn SAE; Chiếu sáng khu vực/Làm việc; Chiếu điểm; Chiếu tỏa rộng; Khác
sv: Ljusmönster: Kombi; Fjärrljus; Flood; Pencil beam; SAE-fjärrljus; SAE-dimljus; Arbetsljus; Spot; Bred flood; Övrigt
es: Patrón del haz: Combinado; Conducción; Inundación; Haz de lápiz; SAE conducción; SAE niebla; Escena/trabajo; Concentrado; Muy amplio; Otro
it: Schema di trave: Combinato; Di marcia; Diffuso; Fascio stretto; Di marcia SAE; Fendinebbia SAE; Scena/Lavoro; Concentrato; Diffuso ampio; Altro
bg-BG: Модел на лъча: Комбиниран; За шофиране; Разсеяна светлина; Тесен лъч; SAE за шофиране; SAE за мъгла; Работна светлина; Насочена светлина; Широка разсеяна светлина; Друго
nl: Balk materiaal: Combi; Verstraler; Breedstraler; Pencil beam; SAE-verstraler; SAE-mistlamp; Scene/werk; Spot; Brede breedstraler; Overige
ru: Диаграмма направленности луча: Комбинированный; Водительский; Заливающий; Узконаправленный (карандашный); Водительский (SAE); Противотуманный (SAE); Рабочий; Направленный; Широкий заливающий; Другое
ro-RO: Modelul de fascicul: Mixt; Fază de drum; Lumină difuză; Lumină focalizată; Fază de drum SAE; Far de ceață SAE; Scenă/Lucru; Spot; Lumină difuză largă; Altele
tr: Işık huzmesi deseni: Karma; Sürüş; Geniş açılı (Flood); Kalem hüzme; SAE sürüş; SAE sis; Sahne/Çalışma; Spot; Ekstra geniş açılı; Diğer
ja: ビームパターン: コンボ; ドライビング; フラッド; ペンシルビーム; SAEドライビング; SAEフォグ; シーン/ワーク; スポット; ワイドフラッド; その他
cs: Tvar světelného kuželu: Kombinovaný; Dálkový; Širokoúhlý; Úzký paprsek; SAE dálkový; SAE mlhový; Scéna / pracovní; Bodový; Extra širokoúhlý; Jiné
hu: Fénynyalábminta: Kombinált; Távolsági; Terítő; Szúrófény; SAE távolsági; SAE ködlámpa; Munkaterület; Pontszerű; Széles terítő; Egyéb